Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1501, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 61, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1501), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1501. There is hereby re-created, to continue until


July 1, 2026 July 1, 2036, in accordance with the provisions of the


Oklahoma Sunset Law, Section 3901 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the State Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand


Reporters which shall consist of five (5) members, all of whom shall


be certified shorthand reporters. The members shall be persons who


have been, for at least five (5) years prior to their appointment to


the Board, residents of this state and certified shorthand


reporters. All members shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of

Req. No. 2806 Page 1


the Supreme Court and shall serve in staggered terms, each for a


period of five (5) years except for the initial appointees. No


member may serve more than one term in succession. The Board shall


elect from its membership a chair and a secretary. Three members


shall constitute a quorum. The Board may adopt a seal for its


official use. All actions of the Board shall be supervised by the


Supreme Court and be subject to approval by the Court.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2806 EB 1/8/2026 1:51:01 PM





















Req. No. 2806 Page 2